apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ABĊDEFĠGGHĦIIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXZŻabċdefġgħghieiejklmnopqrstuvwxzżycYCáéíóúàèìòùñöëäïüçÿāēīōūăĕĭŏŭãẽĩõũ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"       c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"        c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="prn"         c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"         c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="np"          c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="ij"          c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="pr"          c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="rel"         c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="adv"         c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"       c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"        c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="adj"         c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"      c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"      c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="recip"       c="recip"/>
    <sdef n="dem"         c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ord"         c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="neg"         c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="acr"         c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="ref"         c="Reflexive"/>

    <sdef n="an"          c="Animate / inanimate"/>

    <sdef n="m"           c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"           c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"          c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf"          c="Masculine / feminine"/>

    <sdef n="top"         c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="al"          c="Other"/>
    <sdef n="ant"         c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"         c="Cognomen"/>

    <sdef n="comp"        c="Comparative"/>

    <sdef n="sg"          c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"          c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"          c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="du"          c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="col"         c="Collective"/>

    <sdef n="p1"          c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"          c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"          c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="px1sg"       c="First person singular possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg"       c="Second person singular possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_m"     c="Third person singular masculine possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_f"     c="Third person singular feminine possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"       c="First person plural possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl"       c="Second person plural possessive"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl"       c="Third person plural possessive"/>
 
    <sdef n="pres"        c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="past"        c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"         c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"        c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="imp"         c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pp"          c="Past participle"/>

    <sdef n="subj"        c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"         c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="def"         c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"         c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"         c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="pos"         c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="itg"         c="Interrogative"/>

    <sdef n="num"         c="Numeral"/>

    <sdef n="GD"          c="Gender to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="ND"          c="Number to be determined"/>
    <sdef n="cm"          c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"        c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p>          <l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p>          <l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="urls">
    <e>
      <re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="num"/></r> </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>(Lm|€|£) ?.?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?(a|p|A|P).?(m|M).?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    
    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->
    <pardef n="u__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="se__adv"> <!-- Future marker -->
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ma__adv"> <!-- Negative marker -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>m'</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>ma</l><r>ma<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- TODO: check the forms -->
    <pardef n="it-/Tnejn__n">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>it<b/></l><r>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>t<b/></l><r>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>it-</l><r>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>t-</l><r>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lit<b/></l><r>lil<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tat-</l><r>ta'<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sat-</l><r>sa<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mat-</l><r>ma'<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bħat-</l><r>bħal<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>għat-</l><r>għal<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fit-</l><r>fi<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mit-</l><r>minn<s n="pr"/><j/>it-</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>it-</l><r>it-</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i-/erbgħa__n">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i<b/></l><r>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i-</l><r>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>li<b/></l><r>lil<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ta-</l><r>ta'<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sa-</l><r>sa<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ma-</l><r>ma'<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bħa-</l><r>bħal<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>għa-</l><r>għal<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fi-</l><r>fi<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mi-</l><r>minn<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>i-</l><r>il-</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="is-/Sibt__n">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>is<b/></l><r>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>s<b/></l><r>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>is-</l><r>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>s-</l><r>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lis<b/></l><r>lil<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>tas-</l><r>ta'<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sat-</l><r>sa<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mas-</l><r>ma'<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bħas-</l><r>bħal<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>għas-</l><r>għal<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fis-</l><r>fi<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mis-</l><r>minn<s n="pr"/><j/>il-</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>is-</l><r>il-</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jew"><i>jew</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="meta"><i>meta</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mela"><i>mela</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jekk"><i>jekk</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kieku"><i>kieku</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mentri"><i>mentri</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="iżda"><i>iżda</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ġaladarba"><i>ġaladarba</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sija"><i>sija</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="imma"><i>imma</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kif ukoll" c="as well as"><i>kif<b/>ukoll</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="izda" c="but"><i>izda</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="li"><i>li</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="illi"><i>illi</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="għax"><i>għax</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bħalma"><i>bħalma</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="biex"><i>biex</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kieku"><i>kieku</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="sabiex"><i>sabiex</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="però"><i>però</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="minkejja li" c="although"><i>minkeijja<b/>li</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="minkejja" c="despite"><i>minkeijja</i><par n="li__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="it-Tnejn" c="Monday"><par n="it-/Tnejn__n"/><i>Tnejn</i><par n="tniġġis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="it-Tlieta" c="Tuesday"><par n="it-/Tnejn__n"/><i>Tlieta</i><par n="tniġġis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="i-Erbgħa" c="Wednesday"><par n="i-/erbgħa__n"/><i>Erbgħa</i><par n="tniġġis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Sibt" c="Saturday"><par n="is-/Sibt__n"/><i>Sibt</i><par n="dixx__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="qed"><i>qed</i><par n="se__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ħa"><i>ħa</i><par n="se__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="għad"><i>għad</i><par n="se__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ser"><i>ser</i><par n="se__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i></i><par n="/ma__adv"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
